Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.445

Order or action of director—Hearing opportunity.

Upon issuance of an order or upon action by the director under RCW 15.13.400, 15.13.410, 15.13.430, or 15.13.440, the consignor of the plant material may request a hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2000 c 144 s 24; 1993 c 120 s 16.]